Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Article 7. Select Committee on Blockchain, Financial Technology and Digital Innovation Technology

History.

2020 ch. 97, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 97, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 28-11-701.
Appointment of members; powers and duties; executive branch liaisons.

Not later than March 15 following each general election, a select committee on blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation technology shall be appointed subject to the following:

The president of the senate shall appoint four (4) members of the senate apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the senate, provided not more than three (3) of the members shall be from the same political party. The president of the senate shall designate a co-chair of the select committee;

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint four (4) members of the house apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the house, provided not more than three (3) of the members shall be from the same political party. The speaker of the house shall designate a co-chair of the select committee.

The select committee shall:

Develop knowledge and expertise among its members regarding issues pertaining to blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation technology;

Develop and introduce legislation as necessary to promote blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation in Wyoming unless the legislation relates to Title 13 of the Wyoming statues, in which case the legislation shall be recommended to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee for consideration.

Not later than March 15 following each general election, the governor shall appoint three (3) persons to serve as liaisons to the select committee on blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation technology. The governor may, in a manner consistent with W.S.

9-1-202

, remove any liaison to the select committee. The liaisons shall:

Aid, assist and advise the select committee on issues pertaining to blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation technology;

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, serve without salary but may, at the governor’s discretion, receive per diem and mileage or actual expenses for attending meetings in the manner and amounts provided by law for state employees. Members who are government employees shall be considered on official business of their agency when performing duties as liaisons to the select committee.

History.

2020 ch. 87, § 2, effective March 13, 2020; 2020 ch. 97, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 97, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

in (b)(ii) substituted “joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee” for “Minerals, Business & Economic Development Joint Interim Committee.”

Laws 2020, ch. 87, § 5(b), makes Section 2 of the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 97, § 2, provides: “(a) Within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act:

“(i) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint members to the initial select committee on blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation technology in accordance with the requirements of W.S. 28-11-601(a), as created by this act;

“(ii) The governor shall appoint liaisons to the initial select committee on blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation technology in accordance with the requirements of W.S. 28-11-601(c), as created by this act.”